Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 33 Rhode Island College
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-33-1.
Management by board of governors for higher education.

The Rhode Island College shall be under the management of the board of governors for higher education as provided by chapter 59 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 63, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-1

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 55.

16-33-2.
Powers over college — Purposes of college.

The board of governors for higher education shall be responsible for the control, management, and operation of Rhode Island College in the same manner as prior to July 1, 1960, the board of trustees for state colleges had been responsible for the control, management, and operation of the institution under the name of Rhode Island College of Education, and shall continue to exercise the powers previously conferred upon the trustees of Rhode Island Normal School, and any further powers, including the power to confer degrees, as shall be necessary for the continuance and maintenance of the Rhode Island College as a college the chief purpose of which shall be the preparation of teachers, principals, supervisors, and superintendents for service in the public schools of Rhode Island. The board of governors for higher education is authorized to extend the scope of the educational interests of Rhode Island College to include, in addition to and without in any way limiting its educational programs related to the educational preparation of teachers for the schools of the state, general education through degree programs in the liberal arts and sciences.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1869, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 44, §§ 1, 4.

16-33-2.1.
Additional powers of the President of the College.

In addition to any powers granted to the president of Rhode Island College by law or regulation, and consistent with shared governance practices, in conformity with §

16-33-6

, the president shall have the following additional powers and duties:

To create and consolidate departments, divisions, programs, and courses of study within the college with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education within the approved role and scope adopted by the council on postsecondary education pursuant to §

16-59-4

. Any new or proposed eliminations of departments, divisions, programs or courses of study that are outside the role and scope approved by the council shall require the review and approval of the council on postsecondary education.

To adopt a budget for the college and submit it to the council for postsecondary education for approval.

To be responsible for the general management of property of the college.

To recommend to the council on postsecondary education, after consultation with the commissioner of postsecondary, education tables of organization for the college.

To submit to the office of postsecondary commissioner and to compile and analyze the following information for presentation to the council for postsecondary education and the board of education annually by May 1 the following:

A detailed departmental breakdown of all faculty members employed at the college by rank (including all professors, associate professors, assistant professors, lecturers, and instructors) and tenure (tenured and non-tenured, and other) and by race (African American, Hispanic, Native American, and Asian) and gender.

A detailed report on current student enrollments for each class at the college by race and gender, by academic department, and by outreach program (e.g. talent development), guaranteed admissions program, and the current levels of funding and staff support for each of these programs.

A report on the current status of the African and Afro-American studies programs at the college and a five (5) year budgetary history of the programs along with projections for budgetary support for the next two (2) years.

A plan for recruitment of African American and Hispanic faculty into tenure track positions at the college with specific reference to and planned involvement with the New England higher education’s minority faculty recruitment and development plan.

Copies of the report shall be furnished to the council of postsecondary education and the board of education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 3.

16-33-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 63, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 170, § 1, effective August 5, 1996.

16-33-4.
Students paying tuition.

The board of governors for higher education may admit to the classes of the college persons not intending to teach in the public schools of the state upon the payment by them of any tuition fees as may be determined by the board. The board shall make, each term, a return to the general treasurer of all money received by it in pursuance of this authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 861, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-4

.

16-33-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 63, § 5, P.L. 1896, ch. 419, § 1, P.L. 1900, ch. 719, § 1, P.L. 1902, ch. 960, § 1, G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 5, P.L. 1920, ch. 1860, § 1, G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 6, G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 18, impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3, G.L. 1956 §

16-33-5

, impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 317, § 1, effective July 20, 2000.

16-33-6.
Award of degrees — Curriculum and government.

The board of governors for higher education, with the approval of the president and a committee of the faculty of Rhode Island College, shall award academic degrees and diplomas and confer honors in the same manner as is customary in American colleges. It shall also be the duty of the president and a committee of the faculty, with the approval of the board of governors for higher education, to arrange courses of study, prescribe any qualifications for the admission of students and any rules of study, exercise, discipline, and government as the president and committee may deem proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 84; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-6

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3.

16-33-7.
Diploma on graduation.

Persons who shall have passed the regular course of studies at Rhode Island College shall, on the written recommendation of the president, receive a diploma issued by the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 63, § 3; P.L. 1900, ch. 779, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-7

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3.

16-33-8.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for the maintenance and support of the Rhode Island College.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum upon receipt by the controller of vouchers approved by the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 71, § 8; P.L. 1910, ch. 566, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 74, § 9; P.L. 1925, ch. 600, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 188, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 688, §§ 3, 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-33-8

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3.

16-33-9.
Assent to federal provisions for college housing.

All proceeds of the loan or loans received by the board of governors for higher education for the construction of housing facilities for the Rhode Island College shall be paid to the general treasurer of the state and deposited by the treasurer in a separate fund to be known as the “Rhode Island College housing loan fund.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 203, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 18.

16-33-10.
Statutory references — Former name.

Where in any existing law reference is made to Rhode Island College of Education, and where in existing law the term “college” or “said college,” as variously used, refers to Rhode Island College of Education, the reference and the term shall be deemed to refer to Rhode Island College.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 43.